Washington statutes.
RCW 15.21.070

Exempt sales.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following sales at retail or sales at wholesale:

(1) When fresh fruit is sold for charitable purposes or to relief agencies;

(2) When fresh fruit is sold on contract to departments of the government or governmental institutions;

(3) When fresh fruit is sold by any officer acting under the order or direction of any court.

[ 1965 c 61 s 7.]